California statutes. Education Code
(2) To receive a Cal Grant B award under this article, an applicant shall be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meet all of the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3. However, in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3, a student may do either of the following:

(A) Demonstrate attainment of a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.0 on a 4.0 scale.

(B) Reestablish the student’s grade point average by completing at least 16 cumulative units of credit for academic coursework at an accredited California community college, as defined by the commission, by regulation, with at least a 2.0 community college grade point average.

(c) (1) The commission shall use the standardized student financial aid application described in Section 69432.9.

(2) An official financial aid application shall be submitted pursuant to Section 69432.9 and submitted or postmarked no later than September 2 of the academic year for which funds would be applied.

(d) Cal Grant A and B awards shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), respectively.

(e) (1) A student who receives an award under this article may subsequently transfer to a University of California campus, a California State University campus, or an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and remain eligible to receive the award, if the student meets all other requirements of this article and the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(2) A student who receives an award under this article and subsequently transfers to a private for-profit postsecondary educational institution shall not remain eligible to receive an award under this article. The student shall remain eligible to apply for a California Community College Transfer Entitlement Award under Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) or a Competitive Cal Grant A or B award under Article 5
 (commencing with Section 69437), if the student meets all requirements of the relevant article and the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).and remain eligible to receive the award, if the student meets all other requirements of this article and the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(f) (1) An individual selected for a Cal Grant A award who enrolls in a California community college may elect to have the award held in reserve for a period not to exceed two academic years, except that the commission may extend the period in which the individual’s award may be held in reserve for up to three academic years if, in the commission’s judgment, the rate of academic progress has been as rapid as could be expected for the personal and financial conditions that the student has encountered. The commission
 shall, in this case, hold the award in reserve for the additional year. Upon receipt of a request to transfer the award to an institution at which the individual may remain eligible to receive the award pursuant to subdivision (e), the individual shall be eligible to receive the Cal Grant A award previously held in reserve if, at the time of the request, the individual meets all of the requirements of this article. Upon receipt of the request, the commission shall reassess the financial need of the award recipient. The commission may prescribe the forms and procedures to be used for purposes of this section. A recipient’s years of eligibility for payment of benefits shall be based upon the recipient’s grade level at the time the award is transferred to the tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution.

(2) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who meet the
 qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465.

(3) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who are not receiving an award for access costs pursuant to paragraph (2) and meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with
 Section 69470).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if funding is provided in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 11.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Community College Transfer Cal Grant Entitlement Program [69436. - 69436.5.]

69436.

(a) A student who was not awarded a Cal Grant A or B award pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), respectively, at the time of their high school graduation but, at the time of transfer from a California community college to a qualifying baccalaureate program or upon matriculation into the upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, meets all of the criteria set forth in subdivision (b), shall be entitled to a Cal Grant A or B award.

(b) Any California resident transferring from a California community college to a qualifying institution that offers a baccalaureate degree or who matriculates into the upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, is entitled to receive, and the commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall award, a Cal Grant A or B award depending on the eligibility determined pursuant to subdivision (c), if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) A complete official financial aid application has been submitted or postmarked pursuant to Section 69432.9, no later than the March 2 of the year immediately preceding the award year.

(2) The student demonstrates
 financial need pursuant to Section 69433.

(3) The student has earned a community college grade point average of at least 2.4 on a 4.0 scale and is eligible to transfer to a qualifying institution that offers a baccalaureate degree.

(4) The student’s household has an income and asset level not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 69432.7.

(5) The student is pursuing a baccalaureate degree that is offered by a qualifying institution.

(6) The student is enrolled at least part time.

(7) The student meets the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(8) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the student will not be 28 years of age or older by December 31 of the award year.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2027–28 award year through the
 2031–32 award year, inclusive, the student will not be 30 years of age or older by December 31 of the award year.

(9) The student graduated from a California high school or its equivalent during or after the 2000–01 academic year.

(10) (A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B), the student attended a California community college in the academic year immediately preceding the academic year for which the award will be used.

(B) A student otherwise eligible to receive an award pursuant to this section, who attended a California community college in the 2011–12 academic year, may use the award for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 academic years.

(c) The amount and type of the award pursuant to
 this article shall be determined as follows:

(1) For applicants with income and assets at or under the Cal Grant A limits, the award amount shall be the amount established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434).

(2) For applicants with income and assets at or under the Cal Grant B limits, the award amount shall be the amount established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435).

(d) (1) A student meeting the requirements of paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) by means of high school graduation, rather than its equivalent, shall be required to have graduated from a California high school, unless that California resident graduated from a high school outside of California due solely to orders received from a branch of the United States Armed Forces by that student or by that
 student’s parent or guardian that required that student to be outside of California at the time of high school graduation.

(2) For the purposes of this article, all of the following are exempt from the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9 and paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section:

(A) A student for whom a claim under this article was paid before December 1, 2005.

(B) A student for whom a claim under this article for the 2004–05 award year or the 2005–06 award year was or is paid on or after December 1, 2005, but no later than October 15, 2006.

(C) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, a student who did not graduate from high school or its equivalent and was a California resident, as determined pursuant to
 Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of Chapter 1 of Part 41, on their 18th birthday.

(3) (A) The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall make preliminary awards to all applicants currently eligible for an award under this article. At the time an applicant receives a preliminary award, the commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall require that applicant to affirm, in writing, under penalty of perjury, that they meet the requirements set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9, paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section, and paragraph (1) of this subdivision. The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall notify each person who receives a preliminary award under this paragraph that their award is subject to an audit
 pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) The commission shall select, at random, a minimum of 10 percent of the new and renewal awards made under subparagraph (A), and shall require, before the disbursement of Cal Grant funds to the affected postsecondary institution, that the institution verify that the recipient meets the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9, paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of this section, and paragraph (1) of this subdivision. An award that is audited under this paragraph and found to be valid shall not be subject to a subsequent audit.

(C) Pursuant to Section 69517.5, the commission shall seek repayment of any and all funds found to be improperly disbursed under this article.

(D) On or before November 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the
 Legislature and the Governor, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(i) The number of awards made under this article in the preceding 12 months.

(ii) The number of new and renewal awards selected, in the preceding 12 months, for verification under subparagraph (B), and the results of that verification with respect to students at the University of California, at the California State University, at independent nonprofit institutions, and at independent for-profit institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 167)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69436.5.

A participating qualifying institution shall report to the commission annually as to the number of students determined to be independent pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 69436 and the reasons therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Competitive Cal Grant A and B Awards [69437. - 69437.7.]

69437.

(a) Commencing with the 2001–02 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, there shall be established the Competitive Cal Grant A and B award program for students who did not receive a Cal Grant A or B entitlement award pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436). Awards made under this section are not entitlements. The submission of an application by a student under this section shall not entitle that student to an award. The selection of students under this article shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (c) and other relevant criteria established by the commission.

(b) Commencing with the
 2021–22 academic year, a total of 13,000 Cal Grant A and B awards shall be granted annually under this article on a competitive basis for applicants who meet the general eligibility criteria established in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430) and the priorities established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c).

(1) The awards referenced in this subdivision are available to
 students who will be enrolled at an institution other than a California community college during the award year and who meet the financial need and academic requirements established pursuant to this article. A student shall apply by the March 2 deadline.

(2) If any awards are not distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) upon initial allocation of the awards under this article, the commission shall make awards to as many eligible students as possible, beginning with the students with the lowest expected family contribution and highest academic merit, consistent with the criteria adopted by the commission
 pursuant to subdivision (c), as practicable without exceeding an annual cumulative total of
 13,000 awards.

(c) (1) On or before February 1, 2001, acting pursuant to a public hearing process that is consistent with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the commission shall establish selection criteria for Cal Grant A and B awards under the competitive program that give special consideration to disadvantaged students, taking into consideration those financial, educational, cultural, language, home, community, environmental, and other conditions that hamper a student’s access to, and ability to persist in, postsecondary education programs.

(2) Additional consideration shall be given to both of the following:

(A) Students pursuing Cal
 Grant B awards who reestablish their grade point averages.

(B) Students who did not receive awards pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436).

(d) All other students who meet the eligibility requirements pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430) are eligible to compete for an award pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 25.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69437.3.

(a) The commission shall utilize the standardized student financial aid application described in Section 69432.9.

(b) An official financial aid application shall be submitted pursuant to Section 69432.9, submitted or postmarked no later than March 2, or September 2 for students enrolled at a community college.

(c) A student shall be enrolled at least part-time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69437.5.

Cal Grant A and B awards shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69437.6.

(a) An applicant competing for an award under this article shall meet all the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(b) To compete for a competitive Cal Grant A award, an applicant shall, at a minimum, meet all of the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 69434. However, in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirement set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69434, an applicant may submit a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.4 on a 4.0 scale.

(c) To compete for a competitive Cal Grant B award, an applicant shall, at a minimum, meet
 all of the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3. However, in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3, a student may do either of the following:

(1) Demonstrate attainment of a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.0 on a 4.0 scale.

(2) Reestablish the student’s grade point average by completing at least 16 cumulative units of credit for academic coursework at an accredited California community college, as defined by the commission, by regulation, with at least a 2.0 community college grade point average.

(d) To compete for a competitive California Community College Transfer Cal Grant Award, an applicant shall, at a
 minimum, meet the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436), with the exception of paragraphs (8) and (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 69436.

(e) All other competitors shall, at a minimum, comply with all of the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9.

(f) (1) An individual selected for a competitive Cal Grant A award who enrolls in a California community college may elect to have the award held in reserve for a period not to exceed two academic years, except that the commission may extend the period in which the individual’s award may be held in reserve for up to three academic years if, in the commission’s judgment, the rate of academic progress has been as rapid as could be expected for the personal and financial conditions that the student has encountered. The commission shall, in this case, hold the award in reserve for the
 additional year. Upon receipt of a request to transfer the award to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, the individual shall be eligible to receive the Cal Grant A award previously held in reserve if, at the time of the request, the individual meets all of the requirements of this article. Upon receipt of the request, the commission shall reassess the financial need of the award recipient. The commission may prescribe the forms and procedures to be used for the purposes of this section. A recipient’s years of eligibility for payment of benefits shall be based upon the recipient’s grade level at
 the time the award is transferred to the tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution. Any award so held in reserve shall only be counted once toward the
 13,000 awards authorized by this article.

(2) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465.

(3) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is
 held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who are not receiving an award for access costs pursuant to paragraph (2) and meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 26.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69437.7.

After two award cycles, the commission shall review the competitive grant program and its priorities to gain a better understanding of early participation patterns and to determine the initial level of program effectiveness. The commission shall report these findings to the Legislature and the Governor by December 31, 2003, and each year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. California Dreamer Service Incentive Grant Program [69438. - 69438.9.]

69438.

The California Dreamer Service Incentive Grant Program is hereby established, commencing with the 2019–20 academic year, under the administration of the Student Aid Commission. As used in this article, “program” means the California Dreamer Service Incentive Grant Program established by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 513, Sec. 2.   (AB 540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

69438.3.

(a) In order to receive a grant under the program, a student shall either be a recipient of a Cal Grant B award or a recipient of a Cal Grant A award who was eligible for a Cal Grant B award, and shall perform at least 100 hours per quarter or 150 hours per semester of community or volunteer service, as appropriate. The community or volunteer service shall be performed through organizations meeting the requirements of Section 69438.7. The organizations shall report the hours of service performed by participating students to
 the commission in a timely manner.

(b) A participating student is eligible to receive a grant under the program for a maximum of 8
 semesters or 12 quarters. Once a student has met the minimum service requirement, the student is eligible for an award of up to
 two thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($2,250)
 per semester or one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per quarter. The amount of a grant made to an individual participating student shall be calculated as follows:

(1) The student’s award amount per term shall not exceed 50 percent of the student’s annual unmet need
 if the student is enrolled in a semester-based system, or 33.33 percent of the student’s annual unmet need if the student is enrolled in a quarter-based system.

(2) If a student is eligible to receive a grant under the program, the minimum amount awarded in a semester or quarter shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(c) A grant awarded under the program shall not offset or replace any other source of grant aid, including, but not necessarily limited to, institutional aid and scholarships.

(d) No more than 1,667 students who are eligible through meeting all of the requirements of Section 69438.5 shall simultaneously participate in the program. When award slots are available, grants under the program shall be awarded to eligible students on a first-come-first-served basis, with priority established in order of the date and time of the student’s submission of a completed California Dream Act application pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69438.5.

(e) (1) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, upon order of the Director of Finance, any unexpended or unencumbered funds appropriated for purposes of the program, as of June 30 of each fiscal year, shall be transferred to the University of California and the California State University to support the California DREAM Loan Program established in Article 23 (commencing with Section 70030) of Chapter 2.

(2) The Department of Finance shall allocate the funds transferred pursuant to paragraph (1) to the University of California and the California State University proportionally to the share of students awarded a California DREAM Loan at each segment, using data for the most recent fiscal year in which that data is available.

(3) Funds transferred to support the California DREAM Loan Program shall be
 used to support activities in fiscal years subsequent to the initial fiscal year for which the appropriation was provided.

(4) The Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred following the close of a fiscal year to account for changes in available resources.

(f) Of the funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2019–20 for the purposes of the program, up to one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be available on a one-time basis to the commission to support the costs to administer the program for the 2019–20 fiscal
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 12.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69438.5.

A student is eligible to participate in the program if the student meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The student has completed, and submitted to the commission, a California Dream Act application.

(b) The student meets all of the requirements for an exemption from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 or pursuant to a similar provision adopted by the Regents of the University of California.

(c) The student is a recipient of a Cal Grant B award or a recipient
 of a Cal Grant A award who was eligible for a Cal Grant B award.

(d) The student is determined by the commission to have unmet need.

(e) The student is enrolled at a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, or at an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, that is a qualifying institution, as defined in Section 69432.7.

(f) The student agrees to perform the number of hours of community or volunteer service required, pursuant to Section 69438.3, for participation in the
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 13.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69438.7.

In order for the community or volunteer service performed by a participating student to be applied to the minimum hours required for eligibility for this program, the organization and service shall meet all of the following requirements, as determined by the commission:

(a) The organization shall register with the commission, and report the service hours of the participating students.

(b) The organization shall be one of the following:

(1) A federal, state, or local governmental entity.

(2) A qualifying institution as defined in Section 69432.7.

(3) An organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) The community or volunteer service performed by the participating student is not advocacy of a political, social, or religious nature.

(d) The community or volunteer service is related to the participating student’s field of study, or is in furtherance of community service or a community need.

(e) The organization shall have been established for a minimum of two years before the first date on which a participating student begins performing service hours to qualify for this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 513, Sec. 3.   (AB 540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

69438.8.

(a) The commission may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this article as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, no regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for more than 180 days unless the commission complies with all relevant
 provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 513, Sec. 4.   (AB 540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

69438.9.

On or before November 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, the commission shall report to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the program. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information for the prior award year:

(a) The number of recipients and total amount of aid provided, by segment.

(b) The organizations providing service opportunities under the program. For each organization, the commission shall identify the organization type, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 69438.7, and the number of service hours provided.

(c) The amount of unexpended or unencumbered funds transferred to the University of California and the California State University to support the California DREAM Loan Program, established in Article 23 (commencing with Section 70030) of Chapter 2, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 69438.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 14.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cal Grant C Program [69439. - 69439.]

69439.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Career pathway” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 88620.

(2) “Economic security” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) “Industry cluster” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 88620.

(4) “Long-term unemployed” means, with respect to an award applicant, a person who has been unemployed for more than 26 weeks at the time of submission to the commission of
 their application.

(5) “Occupational or technical training” means that phase of education coming after the completion of a secondary school program and leading toward recognized occupational goals approved by the commission.

(b) A Cal Grant C award shall be used only for occupational or technical training in a program of not less than
 eight weeks. A student enrolled in an occupational or technical training program between 8 weeks and 14 weeks in length shall receive a prorated Cal Grant C award amount. A student enrolled in an occupational or technical training program equal to or greater than 15 weeks in length shall receive the maximum Cal Grant C award amount. There shall be the same number of Cal Grant C awards each year as were made in the 2000–01 fiscal year. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 69433.5, a recipient of the Cal Grant C award shall receive an award amount based on the length of the occupational or technical training program. The maximum award amount and the total amount of funding shall be determined each year in the annual Budget Act.

(c) The commission may use criteria it deems appropriate in
 selecting students to receive grants for occupational or technical training and shall give special consideration to the social and economic situations of the students applying for these grants, giving additional weight to disadvantaged applicants, applicants who face economic hardship, and applicants who face particular barriers to employment. Criteria to be considered for these purposes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Family income and household size.

(2) Student’s or the students’ parent’s household status, including whether the student is a single parent or child of a single parent.

(3) The employment status of the applicant and whether the applicant is unemployed, giving greater weight to the long-term unemployed.

(d) The Cal Grant C award recipients shall be eligible for renewal of their grants until they have completed their occupational or technical training in conformance with terms prescribed by the commission. A determination by the commission for a subsequent award year that the program under which a Cal Grant C award was initially awarded is no longer deemed to receive priority shall not affect an award recipient’s renewal. In no case shall the grants exceed two calendar years.

(e) Cal Grant C awards may be used for institutional fees, charges, and other costs, including tuition, plus training-related costs, such as special clothing, local transportation, required tools, equipment, supplies, technology, books, and living expenses. In determining the individual award amounts, the commission shall take into account the financial means available to the student to fund
 their course of study and costs of attendance and other state and federal programs available to the applicant.

(f) (1) To ensure alignment with the state’s dynamic economic needs, the commission, in consultation with appropriate state and federal agencies, including the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Workforce
 Development Board, shall identify areas of occupational and technical training for which students may
 use Cal Grant C awards. Commencing with the 2026–27 academic year, the list of occupations and technical training programs used for purposes of this section shall include, but not be limited to, programs eligible for the federal Workforce Pell Grant program under Article 17 (commencing with Section 69870) of Chapter 2. The commission, to the extent feasible, shall also consult with representatives of the state’s leading competitive and emerging industry clusters, workforce professionals, and career technical educators, to determine which occupational training programs and industry clusters should be prioritized.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the areas of occupational and technical training developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be regularly reviewed and
 updated
 not less than every two years concurrent with development and modification of the state plan required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(B) By January 1, 2016, the commission shall update the priority areas of occupational and technical training.

(3) (A) The commission shall give priority in granting Cal Grant C awards to students pursuing occupational or technical training in areas that meet two of the following criteria pertaining to job quality:

(i) High employer need or demand for the specific skills offered in the program.

(ii) High employment growth in the occupational field or industry cluster for which the student is being trained.

(iii) High employment salary and wage projections for workers employed in the occupations for which they are being trained.

(iv) The occupation or training program is part of a well-articulated career pathway to a job providing economic security.

(B) To receive priority pursuant to subparagraph (A), at least one of the criteria met shall be specified in clause (iii) or (iv) of that subparagraph, or the program may meet the criteria described in paragraph (4).

(4) Commencing with the 2027–28 academic year, the commission may prioritize Cal Grant C awards for students enrolled in programs on the California Priority Jobs Credentials List to the extent that the list is developed pursuant to Section 69873.5, or programs identified on the list developed by the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 69871.

(g) The commission shall determine areas of occupational or technical training that meet the criteria described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) in consultation with the Employment Development Department, the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the California Workforce
 Development Board using projections available through the Labor Market Information Data Library. The commission may supplement the analyses of the Employment Development Department’s Labor Market Information Data Library with the labor market analyses developed by the Economic and Workforce Development Division of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the California Workforce Development Board,